Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 131
MERGER

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Section

7-131-101. Merger.

One or more domestic nonprofit corporations may merge into another domestic entity if the board of directors of each nonprofit corporation that is a party to the merger and each other entity that is a party to the merger adopts a plan of merger complying with section 7-90-203.3 and the members entitled to vote thereon, if any, of each such nonprofit corporation, if required by section 7-131-102, approve the plan of merger.

and (3) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 249, § 54, effective May 29, 2007.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 713, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 2345, § 318, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 249, § 54, effective May 29.

7-131-101.5. Conversion.

A nonprofit corporation may convert into any form of entity permitted by section 7-90-201 if the board of directors of the nonprofit corporation adopts a plan of conversion that complies with section 7-90-201.3 and the members entitled to vote thereon, if any, if required by section 7-131-102, approve the plan of conversion.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 250, § 55, effective May 29.

7-131-102. Action on plan of conversion or merger.

After adopting a plan of conversion complying with section 7-90-201.3 or a plan of merger complying with section 7-90-203.3, the board of directors of the converting nonprofit corporation or the board of directors of each nonprofit corporation that is a party to the merger shall also submit the plan of conversion or plan of merger to its members, if any are entitled to vote thereon, for approval.

If the nonprofit corporation does have members entitled to vote with respect to the approval of a plan of conversion or plan of merger, a plan of conversion or a plan of merger is approved by the members if:

The board of directors recommends the plan of conversion or plan of merger to the members entitled to vote thereon unless the board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the members with the plan; and

The members entitled to vote on the plan of conversion or plan of merger approve the plan as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

After adopting the plan of conversion or plan of merger, the board of directors of the converting nonprofit corporation or the board of directors of each nonprofit corporation party to the merger shall submit the plan of conversion or plan of merger for written approval by any person or persons whose approval is required by a provision of the articles of incorporation of the nonprofit corporation and as recognized by section 7-130-301 for an amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

If the nonprofit corporation does not have members entitled to vote on a conversion or merger, the conversion or merger shall be approved and adopted by a majority of the directors elected and in office at the time the plan of conversion or plan of merger is considered by the board of directors. In addition, the nonprofit corporation shall provide notice of any meeting of the board of directors at which such approval is to be obtained in accordance with section 7-128-203. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed conversion or merger.

The board of directors may condition the effectiveness of the plan of conversion or plan of merger on any basis.

The nonprofit corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-127-104, to each member entitled to vote on the plan of conversion or plan of merger of the members' meeting at which the plan will be voted on. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of conversion or plan of merger, and the notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the plan or a summary thereof.

Unless articles 121 to 137 of this title, the articles of incorporation, bylaws adopted by the members, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (5) of this section require a greater vote, the plan of conversion or plan of merger shall be approved by the votes required by sections 7-127-205 and 7-127-206 by every voting group entitled to vote on the plan of conversion or plan of merger.

Separate voting by voting groups is required on a plan of conversion or plan of merger if the plan contains a provision that, if contained in an amendment to the articles of incorporation, would require action by one or more separate voting groups on the amendment.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 713, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 250, § 56, effective May 29.

7-131-103. Statement of merger or conversion.

After a plan of merger is approved, the surviving nonprofit corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of merger pursuant to section 7-90-203.7. If the plan of merger provides for amendments to the articles of incorporation of the surviving nonprofit corporation, articles of amendment effecting the amendments shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1856, § 144, effective July 1, 2002; p. 1721, § 146, effective October 1, 2002.)

Repealed.

After a plan of conversion is approved, the converting nonprofit corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of conversion pursuant to section 7-90-201.7.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 715, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1856, § 144, effective July 1; IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1721, § 146, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2345, § 319, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1512, § 304, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3) repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended and (4) added, p. 251, § 57, effective May 29.

7-131-104. Effect of merger or conversion.

The effect of a merger shall be as provided in section 7-90-204.

The effect of a conversion shall be as provided in section 7-90-202.

Nothing in this title shall limit the common law powers of the attorney general concerning the merger or conversion of a nonprofit corporation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 715, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1218, § 25, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 251, § 58, effective May 29.

7-131-105. Merger with foreign entity.

One or more domestic nonprofit corporations may merge with one or more foreign entities if:

The merger is permitted by section

7-90-203 (2)

;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 252, § 59, effective May 29, 2007.)

The foreign entity complies with section

7-90-203.7

, if it is the surviving entity of the merger; and

Each domestic nonprofit corporation complies with the applicable provisions of sections

7-131-101

and

7-131-102

and, if it is the surviving nonprofit corporation of the merger, with section

7-131-103

.

Upon the merger taking effect, the surviving foreign entity of a merger shall comply with section 7-90-204.5.

and (4) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 882, § 82, effective July 1, 2006.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 716, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 2346, § 320, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

(2) to (4) amended, p. 882, § 82, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

IP(1), (1)(a) to (1)(c), and (2) amended, p. 252, § 59, effective May 29.